Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.265

Grievances—Procedure—Notice—Hearing—Rules.

(1) Any person aggrieved by any official action of the department or a city sealer conferred under this chapter, including but not limited to, "stop-use orders," "stop-removal orders," "removal orders," "condemnation," or "off sale order" may within thirty days after an order is given or any action is taken, petition the director for a hearing to determine the matter. Such proceedings and any appeal therefrom shall be taken in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The director shall give due notice and hold a hearing within ten days after the confiscation or seizure of any weighing or measuring instrument or device or commodity under RCW 19.94.250 or the seizure of any weighing or measuring instrument or device for evidence under RCW 19.94.260. This hearing shall be for the purposes of determining whether any such weighing or measuring instrument or device or commodity was properly confiscated or seized, to determine whether or not such weighing or measuring instrument or device or commodity was used for, or is in, violation of any provision of this chapter or to determine the disposition to be made of such weighing or measuring instrument or device or commodity. Such proceedings and any appeal therefrom shall be taken in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The department may by rule establish procedures for the administration of this section.

[ 1992 c 237 s 19.]